Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5440XS (3) 91 sb/js S.F. 2125 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 724.33 Lost or stolen firearms ââ 1 reporting ââ penalty. 2 1. The owner of a firearm shall report a lost or stolen 3 firearm to the local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction 4 over the place where the firearm is believed to have been lost 5 or stolen within forty-eight hours of discovering that the 6 firearm has been lost or stolen. 7 2. A person who violates this section commits a simple 8 misdemeanor punishable as a scheduled violation pursuant to 9 section 805.8C, subsection 15. 10 Sec. 2. Section 805.8C, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 11 following new subsection: 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 15. Lost or stolen firearms. For 13 violations of section 724.33, the scheduled fine is fifty 14 dollars. 15